Indiana, session 2026, HB1353.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-9-78 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 78. City of Bedford Food and Beverage Tax
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to the city of Bedford.
Sec. 2. The definitions in IC 6-9-12-1 apply throughout this
chapter.
Sec. 3. (a) The fiscal body of the city may adopt an ordinance to
impose an excise tax, known as the city food and beverage tax, on
transactions described in section 4 of this chapter. The fiscal body
of the city may adopt an ordinance under this subsection only after
the fiscal body has previously held at least one (1) separate public
hearing in which a discussion of the proposed ordinance to impose
the city food and beverage tax is the only substantive issue on the
agenda for the public hearing.
(b) If the city fiscal body adopts an ordinance under subsection
(a), the city fiscal body shall immediately send a certified copy of
2026 IN 1353—LS 6070/DI 134


the ordinance to the department of state revenue.
(c) If the city fiscal body adopts an ordinance under subsection
(a), the city food and beverage tax applies to transactions that
occur after the later of the following:
(1) The day specified in the ordinance.
(2) The last day of the month that succeeds the month in
which the ordinance is adopted.
Sec. 4. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c), a tax imposed
under section 3 of this chapter applies to a transaction in which
food or beverage is furnished, prepared, or served:
(1) for consumption at a location or on equipment provided by
a retail merchant;
(2) in the city; and
(3) by a retail merchant for consideration.
(b) Transactions described in subsection (a)(1) include
transactions in which food or beverage is:
(1) served by a retail merchant off the merchant's premises;
(2) sold in a heated state or heated by a retail merchant;
(3) made of two (2) or more food ingredients, mixed or
combined by a retail merchant for sale as a single item (other
than food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the
seller, and eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these
raw animal foods requiring cooking by the consumer as
recommended by the federal Food and Drug Administration
in chapter 3, subpart 3-401.11 of its Food Code so as to
prevent food borne illnesses); or
(4) sold with eating utensils provided by a retail merchant,
including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins,
or straws (for purposes of this subdivision, a plate does not
include a container or package used to transport food).
(c) The city food and beverage tax does not apply to the
furnishing, preparing, or serving of a food or beverage in a
transaction that is exempt, or to the extent the transaction is
exempt, from the state gross retail tax imposed by IC 6-2.5.
Sec. 5. The city food and beverage tax rate:
(1) must be imposed in an increment of twenty-five
hundredths percent (0.25%); and
(2) may not exceed one percent (1%);
of the gross retail income received by the merchant from the food
or beverage transaction described in section 4 of this chapter. For
purposes of this chapter, the gross retail income received by the
retail merchant from a transaction does not include the amount of
2026 IN 1353—LS 6070/DI 134


tax imposed on the transaction under IC 6-2.5.
Sec. 6. A tax imposed under this chapter shall be imposed, paid,
and collected in the same manner that the state gross retail tax is
imposed, paid, and collected under IC 6-2.5. However, the return
to be filed with the payment of the tax imposed under this chapter
may be made on a separate return or may be combined with the
return filed for the payment of the state gross retail tax, as
prescribed by the department of state revenue.
Sec. 7. The amounts received from the tax imposed under this
chapter shall be paid monthly by the treasurer of state to the city
fiscal officer upon warrants issued by the state comptroller.
Sec. 8. (a) If a tax is imposed under section 3 of this chapter by
the city, the city fiscal officer shall establish a food and beverage
tax receipts fund.
(b) The city fiscal officer shall deposit in the fund all amounts
received under this chapter.
(c) Money earned from the investment of money in the fund
becomes a part of the fund.
Sec. 9. Money in the food and beverage tax receipts fund must
be used by the city only for the following purposes:
(1) Police and law enforcement purposes, firefighting and fire
prevention purposes, emergency medical services and
ambulance services, and other public safety purposes.
(2) The pledge of money under IC 5-1-14-4 for bonds, leases,
or other obligations incurred for the purposes described in
subdivision (1).
Revenue derived from the imposition of a tax under this chapter
may be treated by the city as additional revenue for the purpose of
fixing its budget for the budget year during which the revenues are
to be distributed to the city.
Sec. 10. With respect to obligations for which a pledge has been
made under section 9 of this chapter, the general assembly
covenants with the holders of the obligations that this chapter will
not be repealed or amended in a manner that will adversely affect
the imposition or collection of the tax imposed under this chapter
if the payment of any of the obligations is outstanding.
Sec. 11. (a) If the city imposes the tax authorized by this chapter,
the tax terminates on July 1, 2048.
(b) This chapter expires July 1, 2048.
2026 IN 1353—LS 6070/DI 134